Massachusetts, session 194th, S210.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
2 section 17S the following section:- 
3  Section 17T. For purposes of this section, “complex rehabilitation technology 
4 wheelchair” shall mean an individually-configured manual or motorized wheeled device that 
5 requires evaluation, configuration, fitting, adjustment or programming that is medically 
6 necessary to enhance the mobility or positioning of an individual with a disability. 
7  Any coverage offered by the commission to an active or retired employee of the 
8 commonwealth insured under the commission shall not require a member to obtain a 

2 of 15 9 preauthorization for any repair of a complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair estimated to 
10 cost less than $1,000. 
11  SECTION 2. Chapter 93 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 
12 107, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following 
13 section:- 
14  Section 107. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
15 meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: 
16  “Authorized wheelchair dealer”, any seller of a wheelchair that: (i) has an exclusive 
17 distribution arrangement within a specified geographic area with any person or entity that 
18 manufacturers or assembles the type of wheelchair at issue; or (ii) is designated by the person or 
19 entity that manufactures or assembles the type of wheelchair at issue to repair or accept for repair 
20 such type of wheelchair. 
21  “Collateral costs”, expenses incurred by a consumer in connection with the repair of a 
22 nonconformity, including, but not limited to: (i) the cost to rent a wheelchair or other assistive 
23 device for mobility during the time repairs are attempted and until the receipt of a replacement 
24 wheelchair; (ii) the cost of shipping a wheelchair that has a nonconformity to a manufacturer, 
25 lessor or authorized wheelchair dealer for repair or replacement; and (iii) out-of-pocket medical 
26 expenses for the treatment of any physical injury caused by the nonconformity in the wheelchair. 
27  “Consumer”, (i) the purchaser of a wheelchair, including purchases covered by private or 
28 public insurance, if the wheelchair was purchased from a wheelchair dealer or manufacturer for 
29 purposes other than resale; (ii) a person to whom the wheelchair is transferred for purposes other 
30 than resale; provided, however, that such transfer shall occur before the expiration of an express 

3 of 15 31 warranty applicable to the wheelchair; (iii) a person who may enforce the express warranty 
32 applicable to the wheelchair; or (iv) a person who leases a wheelchair from a wheelchair lessor 
33 under a written lease; provided, however, that “consumer” shall include those who have not paid 
34 all or some out of pocket costs for the purchase or lease of a wheelchair. 
35  “Defective”, having a condition of nonconformity. 
36  “Early termination cost”, an expense or obligation incurred by a wheelchair lessor as a 
37 result of both the termination of a written lease before the termination date set forth in such lease 
38 and the return of a wheelchair to a manufacturer pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (c); 
39 provided, however, that “early termination cost” shall include a penalty for prepayment under a 
40 finance arrangement. 
41  “Early termination savings”, an expense or obligation avoided by a wheelchair lessor as a 
42 result of both the termination of a written lease before the termination date set forth in such lease 
43 and the return of a wheelchair to a manufacturer pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (c); 
44 provided, however, that “early termination savings” shall include interest charges that a 
45 wheelchair lessor would have paid to finance the wheelchair or, if the wheelchair was not 
46 financed, the difference between the total amount for which the lease obligates the consumer 
47 during the period of the lease term remaining after the early termination and the present value of 
48 such amount at the date of the early termination. 
49  “Express warranty”, a warranty that guarantees that the wheelchair shall be free from any 
50 condition or defect that substantially impairs the use, value or safety of the wheelchair. 
51  “Manufacturer”, a person or entity that manufactures or assembles wheelchairs and 
52 agents of that person or entity, including an authorized wheelchair dealer, an importer, a 

4 of 15 53 distributor, factory branch, distributor branch and any warrantors of the manufacturer's 
54 wheelchair; provided, however, that “manufacturer” shall not include a professional who 
55 fabricates, without charge, a device for use in the course of medical treatment. 
56  “Nonconformity”, a condition or defect that substantially impairs the use, value or safety 
57 of a wheelchair and that is covered by an express warranty applicable to the wheelchair or to a 
58 component of the wheelchair; provided, however, that “nonconformity” shall not include a 
59 condition or defect which results from abuse, neglect or the unreasonable and foreseeable misuse 
60 of the wheelchair by consumer modification or alteration. 
61  “Original wheelchair”, the nonconforming wheelchair to be repaired. 
62  “Reasonable attempt to repair”, : (i) not less than 2 attempts to repair a nonconformity by 
63 the manufacturer, wheelchair lessor or any of the manufacturer's authorized wheelchair dealers 
64 which failed to repair the nonconformity after the consumer reported the nonconformity and 
65 made the wheelchair available to the manufacturer for repair within the applicable warranty 
66 period; or (ii) the wheelchair is out of service for an aggregate of not less than 21 days because 
67 of a warranty nonconformity after the consumer reported the nonconformity and made the 
68 wheelchair available to the manufacturer for repair within the applicable warranty period. 
69  “Replacement wheelchair”, a properly working wheelchair that is identical to the 
70 nonconforming wheelchair or that is comparable in all functional capabilities to the original 
71 wheelchair provided by the manufacturer, wheelchair lessor or manufacturer’s authorized 
72 wheelchair dealer to the consumer in place of the nonconforming wheelchair. 
73  “Standard wheelchair”, a manual or power wheelchair that has minimal adjustability and 
74 customization. 

5 of 15 75  “Temporary loaner wheelchair”, a wheelchair provided to the consumer that: (i) is free of 
76 charge; (ii) is in good working order; (iii) is able to perform the most essential functions of the 
77 original wheelchair, considering the disabilities of the user; and (iv) does not have any 
78 differences from the original wheelchair that create a threat to health or safety; provided, 
79 however, that a “temporary loaner wheelchair” need not be new or identical to or have functional 
80 capabilities equal to or greater than those of the original wheelchair. 
81  “Wheelchair”, a manual or motorized wheeled device that enhances the mobility or 
82 positioning of an individual with a disability. 
83  “Wheelchair dealer”, an individual or entity that is in the business of selling wheelchairs, 
84 including, but not limited to, an authorized wheelchair dealer and a manufacturer who sells 
85 wheelchairs directly to consumers. 
86  “Wheelchair lessor”, an individual or entity that leases a wheelchair to a consumer, or 
87 who holds the lessor’s rights, under a written lease. 
88  (b)(1) A manufacturer who sells or leases a wheelchair to a consumer, either directly or 
89 through a wheelchair dealer or wheelchair lessor, shall furnish the consumer with an express 
90 warranty for the wheelchair; provided, however, that the duration of the express warranty shall 
91 be not less than 2 years after first delivery of the wheelchair to the consumer. 
92  (2) At the time of purchase or lease of a wheelchair, the manufacturer shall provide 
93 directly to the consumer a statement, written in not less than 14-point all capital boldfaced type 
94 on a separate piece of paper, or in such other form as the consumer may access, which shall 
95 include the applicable warranty period of not less than 2 years from the date of first delivery, in 
96 substantially the following form: 

6 of 15 97  “IMPORTANT: IF THIS WHEELCHAIR IS DEFECTIVE WITHIN THE PERIOD OF 
98 YOUR WARRANTY, [INSERT WARRANTY PERIOD, NOT LESS THAN 2 YEARS FROM 
99 THE DATE OF FIRST DELIVERY], YOU MAY BE ENTITLED UNDER STATE LAW TO 
100 REPLACEMENT OF THE WHEELCHAIR OR A REFUND OF ITS PURCHASE PRICE. TO 
101 BE ENTITLED TO A REFUND OR REPLACEMENT, YOU MUST FIRST NOTIFY THE 
102 MANUFACTURER, THE WHEELCHAIR LESSOR OR THE WHEELCHAIR DEALER OF 
103 THE NON-CONFORMITY AND GIVE THE MANUFACTURER OR AUTHORIZED 
104 WHEELCHAIR DEALER AN OPPORTUNITY TO REPAIR THE WHEELCHAIR IN 
105 ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 107 OF CHAPTER 93 OF THE MASSACHUSETTS 
106 GENERAL LAWS. 
107  IF THIS WHEELCHAIR IS DEFECTIVE WITHIN THE PERIOD OF YOUR 
108 WARRANTY, THE MANUFACTURER OR AUTHORIZED WHEELCHAIR DEALER 
109 MUST PERFORM A REMOTE ASSESSMENT OF THE WHEELCHAIR NOT MORE THAN 
110 3 BUSINESS DAYS FOLLOWING NOTICE AND, IF NECESSARY, PERFORM AN IN-
111 PERSON ASSESSMENT NOT MORE THAN 4 BUSINESS DAYS FOLLOWING THE 
112 REMOTE ASSESSMENT.  
113  IF NECESSARY, THE MANUFACTURER OR AUTHORIZED WHEELCHAIR 
114 DEALER SHALL PROVIDE A TEMPORARY LOANER WHEELCHAIR FOR THE 
115 DURATION OF REPAIRS PROVIDED FOR UNDER THE WARRANTY AS SOON AS 
116 POSSIBLE, BUT NOT MORE THAN 4 BUSINESS DAYS FOLLOWING NOTICE FOR 
117 STANDARD WHEELCHAIRS AND 8 BUSINESS DAYS FOLLOWING NOTICE FOR 
118 CUSTOMIZED, ADAPTED OR MODIFIED WHEELCHAIRS.”. 

7 of 15 119  (3) If the manufacturer, lessor or wheelchair dealer fail to provide the statement of 
120 warranty as required pursuant to this subsection, the manufacturer shall be in violation of this 
121 subsection and the minimum express warranty period shall be extended to 3 years. 
122  (c)(1) If a new wheelchair is defective and the consumer reports such nonconformity to 
123 the manufacturer, a wheelchair lessor or a wheelchair dealer and such consumer makes the 
124 wheelchair available for repair prior to the expiration of the applicable warranty period from the 
125 date of first delivery, the nonconformity shall be repaired at no charge to the consumer. It shall 
126 be presumed that the consumer has made the wheelchair available to the manufacturer or 
127 authorized wheelchair dealer for repair if such consumer allows the manufacturer or dealer to 
128 take it from the consumer’s home or other location where the user customarily uses the 
129 wheelchair.  
130  (2) If a wheelchair covered by a manufacturer’s warranty has a nonconformity to which 
131 the warranty is applicable and is made available by the consumer to the manufacturer or 
132 authorized wheelchair dealer for the repair of the nonconformity, the manufacturer shall:  
133  (i) perform, or coordinate with an authorized wheelchair dealer to perform, a remote 
134 assessment of the original wheelchair not more than 3 business days following notice from the 
135 consumer and, if it is determined that a remote assessment is not sufficient to diagnose the 
136 nonconformity, an in-person assessment not more than 4 business days following the remote 
137 assessment; provided, however, that if a consumer cancels the initial remote assessment and the 
138 manufacturer or authorized wheelchair dealer makes reasonable efforts to reschedule the 
139 assessment as soon as feasible, the manufacturer or authorized wheelchair dealer shall not be in 
140 violation of this clause; provided, however, that the manufacturer or authorized dealer shall 

8 of 15 141 provide the consumer with an estimated timeframe for assessment and, following assessment, an 
142 estimated timeframe for any repairs;   
143  (ii) provide, or coordinate with an authorized wheelchair dealer to provide, for the 
144 duration of the repair period, directly and at no cost to the consumer, as selected by the consumer 
145 and as soon as reasonably possible: (A) a temporary loaner wheelchair not more than 4 business 
146 days following notice from the consumer if the original wheelchair is a standard wheelchair and 
147 not more than 8 business days following notice by the consumer if the original wheelchair has 
148 been customized, adapted or modified to the extent that a standard wheelchair is not a suitable 
149 temporary loaner wheelchair; or (B) reimbursement for the cost incurred by the consumer for 
150 renting a wheelchair while the original wheelchair is assessed and repaired; and 
151  (iii) cover all of the consumer’s collateral costs. 
152  (3) If, after a reasonable attempt to repair, the nonconformity is not repaired, the 
153 manufacturer shall: 
154  (i) at the direction of a consumer other than one who leases a wheelchair: (A) accept 
155 return of the original wheelchair, issue a replacement wheelchair and refund any collateral costs; 
156 or (B) accept return of the wheelchair and refund to the consumer and to any holder of a 
157 perfected security interest, as their interest may appear, the full purchase price and any finance 
158 charge amount paid by the consumer at the point of sale and any collateral costs, less a 
159 reasonable allowance for use; provided, however, that a reasonable allowance for use shall not 
160 exceed the amount obtained by multiplying the full purchase price of the wheelchair by a 
161 fraction, the denominator of which shall be 1,825 and the numerator of which shall be the 

9 of 15 162 number of days that the wheelchair was in the consumer's possession before the consumer first 
163 reported the nonconformity to the wheelchair dealer; or  
164  (ii) at the direction of a consumer who leases a wheelchair, accept return of the original 
165 wheelchair, refund to the wheelchair lessor and to any holder of a perfected security interest, as 
166 their interest may appear, the current value of the written lease and refund to the consumer the 
167 amount such consumer paid under the written lease and any collateral costs, less a reasonable 
168 allowance for use; provided, however, that a reasonable allowance for use shall not exceed the 
169 amount obtained by multiplying the total amount for which the written lease obligates the 
170 consumer by a fraction, the denominator of which shall be 1,825, or the number of days of the 
171 lease, whichever number is greater, and the numerator of which shall be half of the number of 
172 days that the consumer possessed the wheelchair before first reporting the nonconformity to the 
173 manufacturer, wheelchair lessor or wheelchair dealer; and provided further, that  
174  the current value of the written lease shall be the total amount for which that lease 
175 obligates the consumer during the period of the lease remaining after its early termination, plus 
176 the wheelchair dealer's early termination costs and the value of the original wheelchair at the 
177 lease expiration date if the lease sets forth that value, less the wheelchair lessor's early 
178 termination savings. 
179  To receive a replacement wheelchair or a refund due under paragraph (3) of this 
180 subsection, a consumer described thereunder shall offer to transfer possession of the wheelchair 
181 having the nonconformity to its manufacturer. Not later than 30 days after such offer, the 
182 manufacturer shall provide the consumer with the replacement wheelchair or refund. When the 
183 manufacturer provides the replacement wheelchair or refund, the consumer shall make the 

10 of 15 184 wheelchair having the nonconformity available for return to the manufacturer, along with any 
185 endorsements necessary to transfer legal possession to the manufacturer. 
186  (4)(i) To receive a refund due under clause (i) of paragraph (3) of subsection (C), a 
187 consumer described thereunder shall offer to return the original wheelchair to its manufacturer. 
188 Not later than 30 days after such offer, the manufacturer shall provide the refund to the 
189 consumer. When the manufacturer provides the refund, the consumer shall make the original 
190 wheelchair available for return to the manufacturer. 
191  (ii) To receive a refund due under paragraph (3) of subsection (C), a wheelchair lessor 
192 shall offer to transfer possession of the original wheelchair to its manufacturer. No later than 30 
193 days after such offer, the manufacturer shall provide the refund to the wheelchair lessor. When 
194 the manufacturer provides the refund, the wheelchair lessor shall provide to the manufacturer any 
195 endorsements necessary to transfer legal possession to the manufacturer. 
196  A lease against a consumer shall not be enforced after such consumer exercises rights 
197 pursuant to clause (ii) of paragraph (3). 
198  A wheelchair returned by a consumer or wheelchair lessor in the commonwealth, or by a 
199 consumer or wheelchair lessor in another state under a similar law of that state, shall not be 
200 resold or leased in the commonwealth unless the reasons for such return have been fully 
201 disclosed to a prospective buyer or lessee. 
202  (5) Manufacturers shall fill all repair and replacement orders for wheelchairs under 
203 warranty pursuant to this section from their own inventory or have a written subcontract for the 
204 purchase of items necessary to fill repair and replacement orders; provided, however, that the 
205 subcontract shall be in writing and contain, at a minimum: (i) names, addresses, phone numbers 

11 of 15 206 and contact information for both entities; (ii) the contract term start and end dates; (iii) a 
207 description of the wheelchairs covered under the subcontract and the cost of each item; (iv) 
208 signatures of both parties, including signature dates and position titles; (v) an established credit 
209 limit that is reasonable, based on the value of the products and services to be provided by the 
210 contractor; and (vi) a provision requiring shipping of parts, whenever feasible, by overnight mail. 
211  (6) The manufacturer shall keep written record of all repair attempts made, including, but 
212 not limited to: (i) the date a repair was requested; (ii) the type of repair requested; (iii) the date 
213 the repair attempt began; (iv) the length of the repair attempt; (v) collateral costs covered; (vi) 
214 the results of the repair attempt; and (vii) the total number of repair attempts made.  
215  (d) Each consumer shall have the option of submitting any dispute arising under this 
216 section, upon the payment of a prescribed filing fee, to an alternate arbitration mechanism 
217 established pursuant to regulations promulgated under this section by the undersecretary of 
218 consumer affairs and business regulation. Upon application of the consumer and payment of the 
219 appropriate filing fee by the consumer, a manufacturer shall submit to alternative arbitration. The 
220 alternate arbitration shall be conducted by a professional arbitrator or arbitration firm appointed 
221 by and pursuant to the regulations promulgated by the office of consumer affairs and business 
222 regulation pursuant to this section. The alternate arbitration mechanism shall ensure the personal 
223 objectivity of its arbitrators and the right of each party to present its case, be in attendance during 
224 any presentation made by the other party and rebut or refute such presentation. 
225  (e) The attorney general may bring an action under section 4 of chapter 93A to enforce 
226 this section and to obtain restitution, civil penalties, injunctive relief and any other relief awarded 
227 pursuant to said chapter 93A. Nothing contained in this section shall limit any rights or remedies 

12 of 15 228 available to a consumer under any other law. Any waiver by a consumer of rights under this 
229 section shall be void. 
230  (f) In addition to any other remedy at law, a consumer may bring an action to recover for 
231 damages caused by a violation of this section. The court shall award a consumer who prevails in 
232 such an action twice the amount of any pecuniary loss, together with costs, disbursements and 
233 reasonable attorney fees, and any equitable relief that the court deems is appropriate. 
234  (g) Annually, not later than January 1, the office of consumer affairs and business 
235 regulation shall report to the joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities 
236 and the joint committee on consumer protection and professional licensure on the operational 
237 status of the wheelchair alternate arbitration mechanism, including, but not limited to, data 
238 regarding the number of complaints filed through the alternate arbitration mechanism and the 
239 aggregate results of such arbitration procedures. 
240  (h) The undersecretary of consumer affairs and business regulation shall promulgate 
241 regulations to implement this section, which shall include, but not be limited to, information on 
242 the components and functions necessary for a temporary loaner wheelchair to be in compliance 
243 with this section. 
244  SECTION 3. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
245 section 10Q the following section:- 
246  Section 10R. For purposes of this section, “complex rehabilitation technology 
247 wheelchair” shall mean an individually-configured manual or motorized wheeled device that 
248 requires evaluation, configuration, fitting, adjustment or programming that is medically 
249 necessary to enhance the mobility or positioning of an individual with a disability. 

13 of 15 250  The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance 
251 organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract 
252 to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall not require a 
253 preauthorization for any repair of a complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair estimated to 
254 cost less than $1,000. 
255  SECTION 4. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
256 section 47UU the following section:- 
257  Section 47VV. For purposes of this section, “complex rehabilitation technology 
258 wheelchair” shall mean an individually-configured manual or motorized wheeled device that 
259 requires evaluation, configuration, fitting, adjustment or programming that is medically 
260 necessary to enhance the mobility or positioning of an individual with a disability. 
261  Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued, delivered or 
262 renewed within the commonwealth, which is considered creditable coverage under section 1 of 
263 chapter 111M, shall not require a member to obtain a preauthorization for any repair of a 
264 complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair estimated to cost less than $1,000. 
265  SECTION 5. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
266 section 8VV the following section:- 
267  Section 8WW. For purposes of this section, “complex rehabilitation technology 
268 wheelchair” shall mean an individually-configured manual or motorized wheeled device that 
269 requires evaluation, configuration, fitting, adjustment or programming that is medically 
270 necessary to enhance the mobility or positioning of an individual with a disability. 

14 of 15 271  Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group 
272 hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall not 
273 require a member to obtain a preauthorization for any repair of a complex rehabilitation 
274 technology wheelchair estimated to cost less than $1,000. 
275  SECTION 6. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
276 section 4VV the following section:- 
277  Section 4WW. For purposes of this section, “complex rehabilitation technology 
278 wheelchair” shall mean an individually-configured manual or motorized wheeled device that 
279 requires evaluation, configuration, fitting, adjustment or programming that is medically 
280 necessary to enhance the mobility or positioning of an individual with a disability. 
281  Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement 
282 delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall not require a member to obtain a 
283 preauthorization for any repair of a complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair estimated to 
284 cost less than $1,000. 
285  SECTION 7. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
286 section 4NN the following section:- 
287  Section 4OO. For purposes of this section, “complex rehabilitation technology 
288 wheelchair” shall mean an individually-configured manual or motorized wheeled device that 
289 requires evaluation, configuration, fitting, adjustment or programming that is medically 
290 necessary to enhance the mobility or positioning of an individual with a disability. 

15 of 15 291  Any individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed shall not 
292 require a member to obtain a preauthorization for any repair of a complex rehabilitation 
293 technology wheelchair estimated to cost less than $1,000. 
294  SECTION 8. Section 25 of chapter 176O of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
295 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “services”, in line 49, the 
296 following words:- ; provided, however, that a health plan shall not require a prior authorization 
297 for any repair of a complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair estimated to cost less than 
298 $1,000. 
299  SECTION 9. The undersecretary of consumer affairs and business regulation regulations 
300 shall promulgate the regulations required under subsection (h) of section 107 of chapter 93 of the 
301 General Laws not later than 90 days after the effective date of this act.